Washington statutes.
RCW 43.84.160

Investment counseling fees payable from earnings.

Investment counseling fees established by contract shall be payable from the investment earnings derived from those assets being managed by investment counsel.

[ 1973 1st ex.s. c 103 s 13.]

NOTES:

Severability—1973 1st ex.s. c 103: See note following RCW 2.10.080.